Utah statutes.
59-2-1214.   Redetermination of claim by commission or county.
(1)  If, on the audit of any claim filed under this part, the commission or
the county determines the amount has been incorrectly determined, the
commission or the county shall:
(a)  redetermine the claim; and
(b)  notify the claimant of the redetermination and its reason for the
redetermination.
(2)  The redetermination provided in Subsection (1)(a) shall be final unless
appealed within 30 days after the notice required by Subsection (1)(b).
